Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1042.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-1001, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 91, O.S.L. 2023 (63 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 2-1001), is amended to read as follows:


Section 2-1001. A. There is hereby created until July 1, 2025


2026, in accordance with the Oklahoma Sunset Law, the Opioid


Overdose Fatality Review Board within the Department of Mental


Health and Substance Abuse Services. The Board shall have the power


and duty to:


1. Coordinate and integrate state and local efforts to address


overdose deaths and create a body of information to prevent overdose


deaths;



Req. No. 10610 Page 1


2. Conduct case reviews of deaths of persons eighteen (18)


years of age or older due to licit or illicit opioid use in this


state;


3. Collect, analyze and interpret state and local data on


opioid overdose deaths;


4. Develop a state and local database on opioid overdose


deaths;


5. Improve policies, procedures and practices within the


agencies in order to prevent fatal opioid overdoses and to serve


victims of unintentional overdose; and


6. Enter into agreements with other state, local or private


entities as necessary to carry out the duties of the Opioid Overdose


Fatality Review Board, including but not limited to, conducting


joint reviews with the Child Death Review Board on unintentional


overdose cases involving child death and child near-death incidents.


B. In carrying out its duties and responsibilities, the Board


shall:


1. Promulgate rules establishing criteria for identifying cases


involving an opioid overdose death subject to specific, in-depth


review by the Board;


2. Conduct a specific case review of those cases where the


cause of death is or may be related to overdose of opioid drugs;





Req. No. 10610 Page 2


3. Establish and maintain statistical information related to


opioid overdose deaths including, but not limited to, demographic


and medical diagnostic information;


4. Establish procedures for obtaining initial information


regarding opioid overdose deaths from law enforcement agencies;


5. Review the policies, practices and procedures of medical


systems and law enforcement systems and other overdose protection


and prevention systems, and make specific recommendations to those


entities for actions necessary for the improvement of the system;


6. Request and obtain a copy of all records and reports


pertaining to an adult whose case is under review including, but not


limited to:


a. the report of the medical examiner,


b. hospital records,


c. school records,


d. court records,


e. prosecutorial records,


f. local, state and federal law enforcement records


including, but not limited to, the Oklahoma State


Bureau of Investigation (OSBI) and Oklahoma Bureau of


Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control (OBN),


g. fire department records,


h. State Department of Health records, including birth


certificate records,

Req. No. 10610 Page 3


i. medical and dental records,


j. Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse


Services and other mental health records,


k. emergency medical service records,


l. files of the Department of Human Services, and


m. records in the possession of the Child Death Review


Board when conducting a joint review in accordance


with paragraph 6 of subsection A of this section.


Confidential information provided to the Board shall be maintained


by the Board in a confidential manner as otherwise required by state


and federal law. Any person damaged by disclosure of such


confidential information by the Board or its members which is not


authorized by law may maintain an action for damages, costs and


attorney fees pursuant to The Governmental Tort Claims Act;


7. Maintain all confidential information, documents and records


in possession of the Board as confidential and not subject to


subpoena or discovery in any civil or criminal proceedings; provided


however, information, documents and records otherwise available from


other sources shall not be exempt from subpoena or discovery through


those sources solely because such information, documents and records


were presented to or reviewed by the Board;


8. Conduct reviews of specific cases of opioid overdose deaths


and request the preparation of additional information and reports as


determined to be necessary by the Board including, but not limited

Req. No. 10610 Page 4


to, clinical summaries from treating physicians, chronologies of


contact and second-opinion autopsies;


9. Report, if recommended by a majority vote of the Board, to


the Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the


Speaker of the House of Representatives any information and guidance


regarding the prevention and protection system to advise on changing


trends in overdose rates, substances, methods or any other factor


impacting overdose deaths, including any systemic issue within the


medical, law enforcement or other relevant systems discovered by the


Board while performing its duties; and


10. Exercise all incidental powers necessary and proper for the


implementation and administration of the Opioid Overdose Fatality


Review Board.


C. The review and discussion of individual cases of an opioid


overdose death shall be conducted in executive session. All other


business shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of the


Oklahoma Open Meeting Act. All discussions of individual cases and


any writings produced by or created for the Board in the course of


determining a remedial measure to be recommended by the Board, as


the result of a review of an individual case of an opioid overdose


death, shall be privileged and shall not be admissible in evidence


in any proceeding. The Board shall periodically conduct meetings to


discuss organization and business matters and any actions or


recommendations aimed at improvement of the medical system or law

Req. No. 10610 Page 5


enforcement system which shall be subject to the Oklahoma Open


Meeting Act. Part of any meeting of the Board may be specifically


designated as a business meeting of the Board subject to the


Oklahoma Open Meeting Act.


D. The Board shall submit an annual statistical report on the


incidence and causes of opioid overdose deaths in this state for


which the Board has completed its review during the past calendar


year including its recommendations, if any, to the medical and law


enforcement system. The Board shall also prepare and make available


to the public, on an annual basis, a report containing a summary of


the activities of the Board relating to the review of opioid


overdose deaths, the extent to which the state medical and law


enforcement system is coordinated and an evaluation of whether the


state is efficiently discharging its responsibilities to prevent


opioid overdose deaths. The report shall be completed no later than


February 1 of the subsequent year.




60-1-10610 SW 12/04/24













Req. No. 10610 Page 6